Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
State Police Retirement System
16.576.
Normal retirement for members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Election regarding payment of retirement allowance.

Any member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who has at least five (5) years of service credit may retire at his normal retirement date, or subsequent thereto, upon written notification to the system, setting forth at what date the retirement is to become effective, if the effective date shall be after his last day of service and subsequent to the filing of the notice at the retirement office.

Any member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, who has at least five (5) years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or another state-administered retirement system may retire at his or her normal retirement date, or subsequent thereto, upon written notification to the system, setting forth what date the retirement is to become effective, if the effective date shall be after his or her last day of service and subsequent to the filing of the notice at the retirement office.

The member shall have the right to elect to have his retirement allowance payable under subsection (3), (4), or (6) of this section or any one (1) of the plans set forth in KRS

61.635

.

Effective August 1, 1990, a member of the Kentucky State Police Retirement System may elect to receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly during his lifetime, equal to two and five-tenths percent (2.5%) of final compensation for each year of service credit. Effective August 1, 1988, a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System covered by this section may elect to receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly during his lifetime, equal to two and forty-nine hundredths percent (2.49%) of final compensation for each year of service credit. The annual retirement allowance for a member covered by this section shall not exceed the maximum benefit as set forth in the Internal Revenue Code.

A member of the State Police Retirement System or a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System covered by this section, whose participation begins on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly during his or her lifetime, equal to:

One and three-tenths percent (1.3%) of final compensation for each year of service credit if the employee has earned ten (10) or less years of service at retirement;

One and one-half percent (1.5%) of final compensation for each year of service credit if the employee has earned greater than ten (10) but no more than twenty (20) years of service at retirement;

Two and one-quarter percent (2.25%) of final compensation for each year of service credit if the employee has earned greater than twenty (20) but less than twenty-five (25) years of service at retirement; or

Two and one-half percent (2.5%) of final compensation for each year of service credit if the employee has earned twenty-five (25) or more years of service at retirement.

The member may elect to receive a monthly retirement allowance payable for ten (10) years certain, actuarially equivalent to the retirement allowance payable under subsection (3) of this section. If the member should become deceased prior to the expiration of ten (10) years, his beneficiary, unless the beneficiary is the member’s estate, shall receive the remaining payments monthly for the duration of the ten (10) years. If the member’s estate is the beneficiary, the member’s estate shall receive a lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments. The provisions of KRS

61.702

notwithstanding, the member who retired on June 17, 1978, or thereafter, and his spouse and eligible dependents shall continue to receive the insurance benefits to which they are entitled pursuant to KRS

61.702

after the expiration of ten (10) years. Effective with any insurance contract procured, or self-insurance plan instituted, after July 15, 1990, a member who retired prior to June 17, 1978, and his spouse and eligible dependents shall receive insurance benefits pursuant to KRS 61.702 upon payment by the member or beneficiary of the entire cost of the required insurance premium.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, upon written notification to the system, a member shall have the option to defer his election to receive his retirement allowance. The retirement allowance payable under a deferred option shall be increased to reflect the deferred receipt of benefits.

In lieu of any other benefits due under KRS

16.505

to

16.652

, a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who has attained age fifty-five (55) and who has attained at least one (1) month of service credit but no more than fifty-nine (59) months of service credit may elect to receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly or less frequently as determined by the board, which shall be determined by multiplying his accumulated contributions by two (2) and converting this amount to an annual retirement allowance based on an annuity rate adopted by the board which would pay the actuarial equivalent of twice his accumulated contributions over the lifetime of the retired member.

Subsections (1) to (6) of this section shall not apply to members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014. Members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, shall receive the retirement benefit calculation prescribed by KRS

16.583

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 91, § 7; 1966, ch. 33, § 2; 1968, ch. 25, § 3; 1970, ch. 76, § 3; 1972, ch. 116, § 12; 1974, ch. 128, § 4; 1976, ch. 321, § 5; 1978, ch. 311, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 186, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 293, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 295, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 349, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 364, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 347, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 460, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 240, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 485, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 167, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8, effective June 27, 2008; 2009, ch. 77, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 120, § 38, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 102, § 35, effective April 1, 2021.

16.577.
Early retirement for members who began participating before January 1, 2014.

Upon retirement at early retirement date, a member may receive an annual retirement allowance payable monthly during his lifetime which shall be determined in the same manner as for retirement at his normal retirement date, with years of service and final compensation being determined as of the date of his actual retirement, but the amount of the retirement allowance so determined shall be reduced at an amount determined by the board’s actuary to reflect the earlier commencement of benefits.

For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, there shall be no reduction in the retirement allowance if the member has twenty (20) or more years of service credit, at least fifteen (15) of which are current service.

For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, there shall be no reduction in the retirement allowance if the member has twenty-five (25) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or another state-administered retirement system.

Subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall not apply to members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014. Members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, shall receive the retirement benefit calculation prescribed by KRS

16.583

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 76, § 4; 1978, ch. 127, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 385, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9, effective June 27, 2008; 2013, ch. 120, § 39, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 102, § 36, effective April 1, 2021.

16.578.
Death before retirement — Beneficiary’s options.

If a member dies prior to the first day of the month in which the member would have received his or her first retirement allowance, the member’s beneficiary shall be eligible for the benefits provided by this section if the member had on file a written designation of a beneficiary with the retirement office as provided by KRS

61.542

and the member met the following conditions at the date of his or her death:

The member was eligible to retire under KRS

16.576

,

16.577

, or 16.583(6);

The member was in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with five (5) or more years of service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date; or

The member was not in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with twelve (12) or more years of service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date.

If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is a single person, then the beneficiary may elect to receive:

A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary that is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately prior to his or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one hundred percent (100%) option as provided in KRS 61.635(2);

A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary under the beneficiary Social Security adjustment option as provided in KRS 61.635(9) that is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;

A monthly benefit payable for a period of sixty (60) months that is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;

A monthly benefit payable for a period of one hundred twenty (120) months that is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;

If the member began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, a monthly benefit payable for:

Sixty (60) months certain;

One hundred twenty (120) months certain;

The actuarial equivalent refund; or

The Social Security adjustment option;

that is equivalent to the benefit the member would have been entitled to receive based on his or her years of service and final compensation at the date of his or her death reduced by the survivorship fifty percent (50%) factor as provided for in KRS 61.635(4), then reduced by fifty percent (50%), and that is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

The higher of a refund of the member’s accumulated account balance and interest as described in KRS 61.625(1) or a one (1) time lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount payable under paragraph (a) of this subsection for a period of sixty (60) months.

If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section are multiple beneficiaries or a trust, then the multiple beneficiaries by consensus or the trustee may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent amounts payable under subsection (2)(c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section using the assumption that the beneficiary’s age is the same as the member’s age.

If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is the member’s estate, then the beneficiary shall receive the higher of a refund of the member’s accumulated account balance and interest as described in KRS 61.625(1) or the one (1) time lump-sum payment payable under subsection (2)(f) of this section, using the assumption that the beneficiary’s age is the same as the member’s age.

Payments of taxable distributions made pursuant to this section shall be subject to state and federal tax as appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 91, § 8; 1966, ch. 33, § 3; 1968, ch. 25, § 4; 1970, ch. 76, § 5; 1974, ch. 128, § 5; 1976, ch. 321, § 6; 1980, ch. 186, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 240, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 36, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 77, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 120, § 40, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 96, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 96, sec. 12 provides that the amendments to KRS

16.578

in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 96, sec. 1 are retroactive to June 25, 2009.

(7/13/2004). Although KRS

16.578

was included in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 36, sec. 3, as having been amended, the change in wording was deleted by House Floor Amendment No. 2 to the House Committee Substitute.

16.579.
Death before receiving total retirement allowances — Beneficiary’s options. [Repealed.]

16.580.
Total and permanent disability — Conditions. [Repealed.]

16.581.
Total and permanent disability — Allowances — Exception. [Repealed.]

16.582.
Disability retirement.

Total and permanent disability means a disability which results in the member’s incapacity to engage in any occupation for remuneration or profit. Loss by severance of both hands at or above the wrists, or both feet at or above the ankles, or one (1) hand above the wrist and one (1) foot above the ankle, or the complete, irrevocable loss of the sight of both eyes shall be considered as total and permanent.

Hazardous disability means a disability which results in the member’s total incapacity to continue as a regular full-time officer or as an employee in a hazardous position, as defined in KRS

61.592

, but which does not result in the member’s total and permanent incapacity to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit.

In determining whether the disability meets the requirement of this section, any reasonable accommodation provided by the employer as provided in 42

U.S.C. sec. 12111(9)

and 29 C.F.R. pt. 1630 shall be considered.

If the board determines that the total and permanent disability of a member receiving a retirement allowance under this section has ceased, then the board shall determine if the member has a hazardous disability.

Any person may qualify to retire on disability, subject to the following:

The person shall have sixty (60) months of service, twelve (12) of which shall be current service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1). The service requirement shall be waived if the disability is a total and permanent disability or a hazardous disability and is a direct result of an act in line of duty;

For a person whose membership date is prior to August 1, 2004, the person shall not be eligible for an unreduced retirement allowance;

The person’s application shall be on file in the retirement office no later than twenty-four (24) months after the person’s last day of paid employment, as defined in KRS

16.505

, as a regular full-time officer or in a regular full-time hazardous position under KRS

61.592

;

The person shall receive a satisfactory determination pursuant to KRS

61.665

; and

A person’s disability application based on the same claim of incapacity shall be accepted and reconsidered for disability if accompanied by new objective medical evidence. The application shall be on file in the retirement office no later than twenty-four (24) months after the person’s last day of paid employment as a regular full-time officer or in a regular full-time hazardous position.

Upon the examination of the objective medical evidence by licensed physicians pursuant to KRS

61.665

, it shall be determined that:

The incapacity results from bodily injury, mental illness, or disease. For purposes of this section, “injury” means any physical harm or damage to the human organism other than disease or mental illness;

The incapacity is deemed to be permanent; and

The incapacity does not result directly or indirectly from:

Injury intentionally self-inflicted while sane or insane; or

Bodily injury, mental illness, disease, or condition which pre-existed membership in the system or reemployment, whichever is most recent, unless:

The disability results from bodily injury, mental illness, disease, or a condition which has been substantially aggravated by an injury or accident arising out of or in the course of employment; or

The person has at least sixteen (16) years’ current or prior service for employment with employers participating in the retirement systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System.

For purposes of this subparagraph, “reemployment” shall not mean a change of employment between employers participating in the retirement systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System with no loss of service credit.

An incapacity shall be deemed to be permanent for the purpose of hazardous disability if it is expected to result in death or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve (12) months from the person’s last day of paid employment in a position as a regular full-time officer or a hazardous position.
(4) (a) 1. An incapacity shall be deemed to be permanent for the purpose of hazardous disability if it is expected to result in death or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve (12) months from the person’s last day of paid employment in a position as a regular full-time officer or a hazardous position.

The determination of a permanent incapacity for the purpose of hazardous disability shall be based on the medical evidence contained in the member’s file and the member’s residual functional capacity and physical exertion requirements.

The determination of a total and permanent incapacity shall be based on the medical evidence contained in the member’s file and the member’s residual functional capacity.

The person’s residual functional capacity shall be the person’s capacity for work activity on a regular and continuing basis. The person’s physical ability shall be assessed in light of the severity of the person’s physical, mental, and other impairments. The person’s ability to walk, stand, carry, push, pull, reach, handle, and other physical functions shall be considered with regard to physical impairments. The person’s ability to understand, remember, and carry out instructions and respond appropriately to supervision, coworkers, and work pressures in a work setting shall be considered with regard to mental impairments. Other impairments, including skin impairments, epilepsy, visual sensory impairments, postural and manipulative limitations, and environmental restrictions, shall be considered in conjunction with the person’s physical and mental impairments to determine residual functional capacity.

The person’s physical exertion requirements shall be determined based on the following standards:

Sedentary work shall be work that involves lifting no more than ten (10) pounds at a time and occasionally lifting or carrying articles such as large files, ledgers, and small tools. Although a sedentary job primarily involves sitting, occasional walking and standing may also be required in the performance of duties.

Light work shall be work that involves lifting no more than twenty (20) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing up to ten (10) pounds. A job shall be in this category if lifting is infrequently required but walking and standing are frequently required, or if the job primarily requires sitting with pushing and pulling of arm or leg controls. If the person has the ability to perform substantially all of these activities, the person shall be deemed capable of light work. A person deemed capable of light work shall be deemed capable of sedentary work unless the person has additional limitations such as the loss of fine dexterity or inability to sit for long periods.

Medium work shall be work that involves lifting no more than fifty (50) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty-five (25) pounds. If the person is deemed capable of medium work, the person shall be deemed capable of light and sedentary work.

Heavy work shall be work that involves lifting no more than one hundred (100) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing up to fifty (50) pounds. If the person is deemed capable of heavy work, the person shall also be deemed capable of medium, light, and sedentary work.

Very heavy work shall be work that involves lifting objects weighing more than one hundred (100) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing fifty (50) or more pounds. If the person is deemed capable of very heavy work, the person shall be deemed capable of heavy, medium, light, and sedentary work.

The disability retirement allowance shall be determined as provided in KRS

16.576

, except if the member’s total service credit on his or her last day of paid employment in a regular full-time position is less than twenty (20) years, service shall be added beginning with his or her last date of paid employment and continuing to his or her fifty-fifth birthday. The maximum service credit added shall not exceed the total service the member had on his or her last day of paid employment, and the maximum service credit for calculating his or her retirement allowance, including his or her total service and service added under this section, shall not exceed twenty (20) years.

For a member whose participation begins on or after August 1, 2004, but prior to January 1, 2014, the disability retirement allowance shall be the higher of twenty-five percent (25%) of the member’s monthly final rate of pay or the retirement allowance determined in the same manner as for retirement at his or her normal retirement date with years of service and final compensation being determined as of the date of his disability.

For a member who begins participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

16.583

, the disability retirement allowance shall be the higher of twenty-five percent (25%) of the member’s monthly final rate of pay or the retirement allowance determined in the same manner as for retirement at his or her normal retirement date under KRS

16.583

.

If the member receives a satisfactory determination of hazardous disability pursuant to KRS

61.665

and the disability is the direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

, the member’s retirement allowance shall be calculated as follows:

For the disabled member, benefits as provided in subsection (5) of this section except that the monthly retirement allowance payable shall not be less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the member’s monthly final rate of pay; and

For each dependent child of the member on his or her disability retirement date, who is alive at the time any particular payment is due, a monthly payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the disabled member’s monthly final rate of pay; however, total maximum dependent children’s benefit shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of the member’s monthly final rate of pay. The payments shall be payable to each dependent child, or to a legally appointed guardian or as directed by the system.

If the member receives a satisfactory determination of total and permanent disability pursuant to KRS

61.665

and the disability is the direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

, the member’s retirement allowance shall be calculated as follows:

For the disabled member, the benefits as provided in subsection (5) of this section except that the monthly retirement allowance payable shall not be less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the member’s monthly average pay; and

For each dependent child of the member on his or her disability retirement date, who is alive at the time any particular payment is due, a monthly payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the disabled member’s monthly average pay, except that:

Member and dependent children payments under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s monthly average pay; and

Total maximum dependent children’s benefits shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the member’s monthly average pay while the member is living and forty percent (40%) of the member’s monthly average pay after the member’s death. The payments shall be payable to each dependent child, or to a legally appointed guardian or as directed by the system, and shall be divided equally among all dependent children.

No benefit provided in this section shall be reduced as a result of any change in the extent of disability of any retired member who is the age of normal retirement or older.

If a regular full-time officer or hazardous position member has been approved for benefits under a hazardous disability, the board shall, upon request of the member, permit the member to receive the hazardous disability allowance while accruing benefits in a nonhazardous position, subject to proper medical review of the nonhazardous position’s job description by the system’s medical examiner.

For a member of the State Police Retirement System, in lieu of the allowance provided in subsection (5) to (7) of this section, the member may be retained on the regular payroll and receive the compensation authorized by KRS

16.165

, if he or she is qualified.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 485, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 167, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 105, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 385, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 36, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 120, § 41, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 32, § 3, effective June 28, 2017; 2021 ch. 102, § 37, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 106, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 216, § 1, effective April 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). See 2021 Ky. Acts Ch. 106, secs. 10, 11, 12, and 13 for information regarding the application of the amendments to this statute made in that Act.

16.583.
Hybrid cash balance plan for members of State Police Retirement System and Kentucky Employees Retirement System in hazardous duty positions — Member contributions and employer pay credits — Interest credits — Termination of employment — Options upon retirement — Applicability of statute. [Effective until April 1, 2023]

A member of the State Police Retirement System, a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System in a hazardous duty position covered by this section, whose participation begins on or after January 1, 2014, or a member making an election pursuant to KRS

61.5955

, shall receive the retirement benefits provided by this section in lieu of the retirement benefits provided under KRS

16.576

and

16.577

. The retirement benefit provided by this section shall be known as the hybrid cash balance plan and shall operate as another benefit tier within the State Police Retirement System and the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

The hybrid cash balance plan shall provide a retirement benefit based upon the member’s accumulated account balance, which shall include:

Contributions made by the member as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

and

61.510

to

61.705

, except for employee contributions prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);

An employer pay credit of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the creditable compensation earned by the employee for each month the employee is contributing to the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section; and

Interest credits added annually to the member’s accumulated account balance as provided by this section.

Member contributions and employer pay credits as provided by subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section shall be credited to the member’s account monthly as contributions are reported and posted to the system in accordance with KRS

61.675

.

Interest credits, as provided by subsection (2)(c) of this section, shall be credited to the member’s account annually on June 30 of each fiscal year, as determined by subsection (4) of this section.

On June 30 of each fiscal year, the system shall determine if the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year.

If the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by a percentage increase equal to:

Four percent (4%); plus

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the system’s geometric average net investment return in excess of a four percent (4%) rate of return.

If the member did not contribute to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by four percent (4%).

For purposes of this subsection, “system’s geometric average net investment return”:

Means the annual average geometric investment return, net of administrative and investment fees and expenses, over the last five (5) fiscal years as of the date the interest is credited to the member’s account; and

Shall be expressed as a percentage and based upon the system in which the member has an account.

No employer pay credits or interest credits shall be provided to a member who has taken a refund of contributions as provided by KRS

61.625

or who has retired and annuitized his or her accumulated account balance as prescribed by this section.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has less than five (5) years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), and 78.615(1), who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

, shall forfeit the accumulated employer credit, and shall only receive a refund of his or her accumulated contributions.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has five (5) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), and 78.615(1), who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

, shall receive a full refund of his or her accumulated account balance.

A member participating in the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section may retire:

At his or her normal retirement date, provided he or she has earned five (5) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1), or another state-administered retirement system; or

At any age, provided he or she has earned twenty-five (25) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1), or another state-administered retirement system.

A member eligible to retire under subsection (6) of this section may elect to:

Receive a monthly retirement allowance payable for life by having his or her accumulated account balance annuitized by the retirement systems in accordance with the actuarial assumptions and actuarial methods adopted by the board and in effect on the member’s retirement date;

Receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her retirement allowance calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection payable under one (1) of the options set forth in KRS

61.635

, except for the option provided by KRS

61.635

(11); or

Take a refund of his or her account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to members who began participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System prior to January 1, 2014, except for those members who make an election pursuant to KRS

61.5955

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 8, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 125, § 8, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 40, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 102, § 38, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 ( 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

16.583.
Hybrid cash balance plan for members of State Police Retirement System and Kentucky Employees Retirement System in hazardous duty positions — Member contributions and employer pay credits — Interest credits — Termination of employment — Options upon retirement — Applicability of statute. [Effective April 1, 2023]

A member of the State Police Retirement System, a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System in a hazardous duty position covered by this section, whose participation begins on or after January 1, 2014, or a member making an election pursuant to KRS

61.5955

, shall receive the retirement benefits provided by this section in lieu of the retirement benefits provided under KRS

16.576

and

16.577

. The retirement benefit provided by this section shall be known as the hybrid cash balance plan and shall operate as another benefit tier within the State Police Retirement System and the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

The hybrid cash balance plan shall provide a retirement benefit based upon the member’s accumulated account balance, which shall include:

Contributions made by the member as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

and

61.510

to

61.705

, except for employee contributions prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);

An employer pay credit of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the creditable compensation earned by the employee for each month the employee is contributing to the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section; and

For members of the State Police Retirement System covered by this section, an employer pay credit for the value of accumulated sick leave as determined and limited by KRS

16.584

; and

Interest credits added annually to the member’s accumulated account balance as provided by this section.

Member contributions and employer pay credits as provided by subsection (2)(a) and (b)1. of this section shall be credited to the member’s account monthly as contributions are reported and posted to the system in accordance with KRS

61.675

.

Interest credits, as provided by subsection (2)(c) of this section, shall be credited to the member’s account annually on June 30 of each fiscal year, as determined by subsection (4) of this section.

Employer pay credits for accumulated sick leave shall be credited to the member’s account as determined by KRS

16.584

.

On June 30 of each fiscal year, the system shall determine if the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year.

If the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by a percentage increase equal to:

Four percent (4%); plus

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the system’s geometric average net investment return in excess of a four percent (4%) rate of return.

If the member did not contribute to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by four percent (4%).

For purposes of this subsection, “system’s geometric average net investment return”:

Means the annual average geometric investment return, net of administrative and investment fees and expenses, over the last five (5) fiscal years as of the date the interest is credited to the member’s account; and

Shall be expressed as a percentage and based upon the system in which the member has an account.

No employer pay credits or interest credits shall be provided to a member who has taken a refund of contributions as provided by KRS

61.625

or who has retired and annuitized his or her accumulated account balance as prescribed by this section.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has less than five (5) years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), and 78.615(1), who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

, shall forfeit the accumulated employer credit, and shall only receive a refund of his or her accumulated contributions.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has five (5) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), and 78.615(1), who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

, shall receive a full refund of his or her accumulated account balance.

A member participating in the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section may retire:

At his or her normal retirement date, provided he or she has earned five (5) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1), or another state-administered retirement system; or

At any age, provided he or she has earned twenty-five (25) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1), or another state-administered retirement system.

A member eligible to retire under subsection (6) of this section may elect to:

Receive a monthly retirement allowance payable for life by having his or her accumulated account balance annuitized by the retirement systems in accordance with the actuarial assumptions and actuarial methods adopted by the board and in effect on the member’s retirement date;

Receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her retirement allowance calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection payable under one (1) of the options set forth in KRS

61.635

, except for the option provided by KRS

61.635

(11); or

Take a refund of his or her account balance as provided by KRS

61.625

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to members who began participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System prior to January 1, 2014, except for those members who make an election pursuant to KRS

61.5955

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 8, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 125, § 8, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 40, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 102, § 38, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 181, § 2, effective April 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/1/2023).
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 181, sec. 10, reads as follows: “In the event that budgeted funds in fiscal year 2023-2024 of the executive branch budget are insufficient to fund the program established by subsection (2)(b)2. of Section 2 of this Act [this statute] and Section 3 of this Act for that fiscal year, the program shall, notwithstanding any provision of Section 3 to the contrary, still be provided in fiscal year 2023-2024 and any additional funding needed for the benefits provided in fiscal year 2023-2024 shall be included in the employer contribution rates payable for fiscal years occurring on or after July 1, 2024.”